Utah statutes.
17C-3-105.   Board resolution approving an economic development project area
plan -- Requirements.
Each board resolution approving a draft economic development project area plan
as the project area plan under Subsection 17C-3-102(1)(g) shall contain:
(1)  a legal description of the boundaries of the project area that is the
subject of the project area plan;
(2)  the agency's purposes and intent with respect to the project area;
(3)  the project area plan incorporated by reference; and
(4)  the board findings and determinations that:
(a)  there is a need to effectuate a public purpose;
(b)  there is a public benefit under the analysis described in Subsection
17C-3-103(2);
(c)  it is economically sound and feasible to adopt and carry out the project
area plan;
(d)  the project area plan conforms to the community's general plan; and
(e)  carrying out the project area plan will promote the public peace, health,
safety, and welfare of the community in which the project area is located.
